Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 321G.13, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2. a. A person shall not operate or ride a snowmobile with a firearm in the personâs possession unless it is unloaded and enclosed in a carrying case, except as otherwise provided. However, a nonambulatory person may carry an uncased and unloaded firearm while operating or riding a snowmobile. Senate File 106, p. 2 b. (1) A person may operate or ride a snowmobile with a loaded firearm, whether concealed or not, without a permit to carry weapons, if the person operates or rides on land owned, possessed, or rented by the person and the personâs conduct is otherwise lawful. (2) A person may operate or ride a snowmobile with a loaded pistol or revolver, whether concealed or not, if the person is operating or riding the snowmobile on land that is not owned, possessed, or rented by the person, and the personâs conduct is otherwise lawful. c. A person shall not discharge a firearm while on a snowmobile, except that a nonambulatory person may discharge a firearm from a snowmobile while lawfully hunting if the person is not operating or riding a moving snowmobile. Sec. 2. Section 321I.14, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2. a. A person shall not operate or ride an all-terrain vehicle with a firearm in the personâs possession unless it is unloaded and enclosed in a carrying case, except as otherwise provided. However, a nonambulatory person may carry an uncased and unloaded firearm while operating or riding an all-terrain vehicle. b. (1) A person may operate or ride an all-terrain vehicle with a loaded firearm, whether concealed or not, without a permit to carry weapons, if the person operates or rides on land owned, possessed, or rented by the person and the personâs conduct is otherwise lawful. (2) A person may operate or ride an all-terrain vehicle with a loaded pistol or revolver, whether concealed or not, if the person is operating or riding the all-terrain vehicle on land that is not owned, possessed, or rented by the person, and the personâs conduct is otherwise lawful. c. A person shall not discharge a firearm while on an all-terrain vehicle, except that a nonambulatory person may discharge a firearm from an all-terrain vehicle while lawfully hunting if the person is not operating or riding a moving all-terrain vehicle. Sec. 3. Section 805.8B, subsection 3, paragraph q, Code 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. Senate File 106, p. 3 Sec. 4. REPEAL. Section 483A.36, Code 2025, is repealed. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 106, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor